Utah statutes.
39-6-12.   Person accused of offense against civilian -- Sentences of
military and civilian courts.
(1)  Under this chapter, a person on duty and subject to this chapter who is
accused of an offense against a civilian person may be delivered, upon
request, to the civilian authority for judicial proceedings.
(2) (a)  When a person under sentence imposed by a military court is delivered
to a civilian authority under this section, and the person is convicted in a
civilian court, the execution of the sentence of the military court is
interrupted.
(b)  After the person has completed the sentence imposed by the civilian
court, upon request of military authority, he shall be returned to military
custody for completion of his military court sentence.
